Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
ARTICLE 10 UNIFORM DISSOLUTION OF MARRIAGE ACT
14-10-122. Modification and termination of provisions for maintenance, support, and property disposition - automatic lien - definitions.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 14-10-112 (6) and 14-10-115 (11)(c), the provisions of any decree respecting maintenance may be modified only as to installments accruing subsequent to the motion for modification and only upon a showing of changed circumstances so substantial and continuing as to make the terms unfair, and, except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, the provisions of any decree respecting child support may be modified only as to installments accruing subsequent to the filing of the motion for modification and only upon a showing of changed circumstances that are substantial and continuing or on the ground that the order does not contain a provision regarding medical support, such as insurance coverage, payment for medical insurance deductibles and copayments, or unreimbursed medical expenses. The trial court retains continuing jurisdiction to modify a decree respecting maintenance or child support pursuant to this section during the pendency of an appeal. The court shall not revoke or modify the provisions as to property disposition unless the court finds the existence of conditions that justify the reopening of a judgment.

Application of the child support guidelines and schedule of basic child support obligations set forth in section 14-10-115 to the circumstances of the parties at the time of the filing of a motion for modification of the child support order which results in less than a ten percent change in the amount of support due per month shall be deemed not to be a substantial and continuing change of circumstances.

In any action or proceeding in any court of this state in which child support, maintenance when combined with child support, or maintenance is ordered, a payment becomes a final money judgment, referred to in this section as a support judgment, when it is due and not paid. Such payment is not retroactively modified except pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section and may be enforced as other judgments without further action by the court; except that an existing child support order with respect to child support payable by the obligor may be modified retroactively to the time that a mutually agreed upon change of physical custody occurs pursuant to subsection (5) of this section. A support judgment is entitled to full faith and credit and may be enforced in any court of this state or any other state. In order to enforce a support judgment, the obligee shall file with the court that issued the order a verified entry of support judgment specifying the period of time that the support judgment covers and the total amount of the support judgment for that period. The obligee or the delegate child support enforcement unit is not required to wait fourteen days to execute on such support judgment. However, a copy of the verified entry of support judgment must be provided to all parties pursuant to rule 5 of the Colorado rules of civil procedure, upon filing with the court. A verified entry of support judgment is not required to be signed by an attorney. A verified entry of support judgment may be used to enforce a support judgment for debt entered pursuant to section 14-14-104. The filing of a verified entry of support judgment revives all individual support judgments that have arisen during the period of time specified in the entry of support judgment and that have not been satisfied, pursuant to rule 54 (h) of the Colorado rules of civil procedure, without the requirement of a separate motion, notice, or hearing. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (1)(c), no court order for support judgment nor verified entry of support judgment is required in order for the county and state child support enforcement units to certify past-due amounts of child support to the internal revenue service or to the department of revenue for purposes of intercepting a federal or state tax refund or lottery winnings.

If maintenance or child support is modified pursuant to this section, the modification should be effective as of the date of the filing of the motion, unless the court finds that it would cause undue hardship or substantial injustice or unless there has been a mutually agreed upon change of physical custody as provided for in subsection (5) of this section. In no instance shall the order be retroactively modified prior to the date of filing, unless there has been a mutually agreed upon change of physical custody. The court may modify installments of maintenance or child support due between the filing of the motion and the entry of the order even if the circumstances justifying the modification no longer exist at the time the order is entered.

(1.5)

Lien by operation of law. (I) Commencing July 1, 1997, all cases in which services are provided in accordance with Title IV-D of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, referred to in this subsection (1.5) as "IV-D cases", shall be subject to the provisions of this subsection (1.5), regardless of the date the order for child support was entered. In any IV-D case in which current child support, child support when combined with maintenance, or maintenance has been ordered, a payment becomes a support judgment when it is due and not paid, and a lien therefor is created by operation of law against the obligor's real and personal property and any interest in any such real or personal property. The entry of an order for child support debt, retroactive child support, or child support arrearages or a verified entry of judgment pursuant to this section creates a lien by operation of law against the obligor's real and personal property and any interest in any such real and personal property.

(II) The amount of such lien shall be limited to the amount of the support judgment for outstanding child support, child support when combined with maintenance, maintenance, child support debt, retroactive child support, or child support arrearages, any interest accrued thereon, and the amount of any filing fees as specified in this section.

(III) A support judgment or lien shall be entitled to full faith and credit and may be enforced in any court of this state or any other state. Full faith and credit shall be accorded to such a lien arising from another state that complies with the provisions of this subsection (1.5). Judicial notice or hearing or the filing of a verified entry of judgment shall not be required prior to the enforcement of such a lien.

(IV) The creation of a lien pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any other remedy allowed by law.

Lien on real property. (I) To evidence a lien on real property created pursuant to this subsection (1.5), a delegate child support enforcement unit shall issue a notice of lien and record the same in the real estate records in the office of the clerk and recorder of any county in the state of Colorado in which the obligor holds an interest in real property. From the time of recording of the notice of lien, such lien shall be an encumbrance in favor of the obligee, or the assignee of the obligee, and shall encumber any interest of the obligor in any real property in such county.

(II) The lien on real property created by this section shall remain in effect for the earlier of twelve years or until all past-due amounts are paid, including any accrued interest and costs, without the necessity of renewal. A lien on real property arising pursuant to this subsection (1.5) may be extended or renewed indefinitely beyond twelve years by rerecording the lien every twelve years. Within twenty calendar days after satisfaction of the debt or debts described in the notice of lien, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall record a release of lien with the clerk and recorder of the county where the notice of lien was recorded. A release of lien shall be conclusive evidence that the lien is extinguished.

(III) The child support enforcement unit shall be exempt from the payment of recording fees charged by the clerk and recorder for the recording of notices of lien or releases of lien.

Lien on personal property other than wages, insurance claim payments, awards, and settlements, and money held by a financial institution as defined in 42 U.S.C. sec. 669a (d)(1) or motor vehicles. (I) To evidence a lien on personal property, other than wages; insurance claim payments, awards, and settlements as authorized in section 26-13-122.7; accounts as authorized in section 26-13-122.3; and money held by a financial institution as defined in 42 U.S.C. sec. 669a (d)(1) or motor vehicles, created pursuant to this subsection (1.5), the state child support enforcement agency shall file a notice of lien with the secretary of state by means of direct electronic data transmission. From the time of filing the notice of lien with the secretary of state, the lien is an encumbrance in favor of the obligee, or the assignee of the obligee, and encumbers all personal property or any interest of the obligor in any personal property.

(II) The lien on personal property created by this section shall remain in effect for the earlier of twelve years or until all past-due amounts are paid, including any accrued interest and costs, without the necessity of renewal. A lien on personal property arising pursuant to this subsection (1.5) may be extended or renewed indefinitely beyond twelve years by rerecording the lien every twelve years. Within twenty calendar days after satisfaction of the debt or debts described in the notice of lien, the state child support enforcement agency shall file a release of lien with the secretary of state. The filing of such a release of lien shall be conclusive evidence that the lien is extinguished.

(III) The state child support enforcement agency shall be exempt from paying a fee for the filing of notices of liens or releases of liens with the secretary of state pursuant to this paragraph (c).

(IV) For purposes of this paragraph (c), "personal property" means property that the child support enforcement agency has determined has a net equity value of not less than five thousand dollars at the time of the filing of the notice of lien with the secretary of state.

Lien on motor vehicles. (I) (A) To evidence a lien on a motor vehicle created pursuant to this subsection (1.5), a delegate child support enforcement unit shall issue a notice of lien to the authorized agent as defined in section 42-6-102 (1.5) by first class mail. From the time of filing of the lien for public record and the notation of such lien on the owner's certificate of title, such lien shall be an encumbrance in favor of the obligee, or the assignee of the obligee, and must encumber any interest of the obligor in the motor vehicle. In order for any such lien to be effective as a valid lien against a motor vehicle, the obligee, or assignee of the obligee, shall have such lien filed for public record and noted on the owner's certificate of title in the manner provided in sections 42-6-121 and 42-6-129.

(B) Liens on motor vehicles created by this section shall remain in effect for the same period of time as any other lien on motor vehicles as specified in section 42-6-127, C.R.S., or until the entire amount of the lien is paid, whichever occurs first. A lien created pursuant to this section may be renewed pursuant to section 42-6-127, C.R.S. Within twenty calendar days after satisfaction of the debt or debts described in the notice of lien, the delegate child support enforcement unit shall release the lien pursuant to the procedures specified in section 42-6-125, C.R.S. When a lien on a motor vehicle created pursuant to this subsection (1.5) is released, the authorized agent and the executive director of the department of revenue shall proceed as provided in section 42-6-126, C.R.S.

(C) The child support enforcement unit shall not be exempt from the payment of filing fees charged by the authorized agent for the filing of either the notice of lien or the release of lien. However, the child support enforcement unit may add the amount of the filing fee to the lien amount and collect the amount of such fees from the obligor.

(II) For purposes of this subsection (1.5), "motor vehicle" means any self-propelled vehicle that is designed primarily for travel on the public highways and that is generally and commonly used to transport persons and property over the public highways, trailers, semitrailers, and trailer coaches, without motive power; that has a net equity value based upon the loan value identified for such vehicle in the national automobile dealers' association car guide of not less than five thousand dollars at the time of the filing of the notice of lien and that meets such additional conditions as the state board of human services may establish by rule; and on which vehicle a lien already exists that is filed for public record and noted accordingly on the owner's certificate of title. "Motor vehicle" does not include low-power scooters, as defined in section 42-1-102, C.R.S.; vehicles that operate only upon rails or tracks laid in place on the ground or that travel through the air or that derive their motive power from overhead electric lines; farm tractors, farm trailers, and other machines and tools used in the production, harvesting, and care of farm products; and special mobile machinery or industrial machinery not designed primarily for highway transportation. "Motor vehicle" does not include a vehicle that has a net equity value based upon the loan value identified for such vehicle in the national automobile dealers' association car guide of less than five thousand dollars at the time of the filing of the notice of lien and does not include a vehicle that is not otherwise encumbered by a lien or mortgage that is filed for public record and noted accordingly on the owner's certificate of title.

Priority of a lien. (I) A lien on real property created pursuant to this section shall be in effect for the earlier of twelve years or until all past-due amounts are paid and shall have priority over all unrecorded liens and all subsequent recorded or unrecorded liens from the time of recording, except such liens as may be exempted by regulation of the state board of human services. A lien on real property arising pursuant to this subsection (1.5) may be extended or renewed indefinitely beyond twelve years by rerecording the lien every twelve years.

(II) A lien on personal property, other than motor vehicles, created pursuant to this section shall be in effect for the earlier of twelve years or until all past-due amounts are paid and shall have priority from the time the lien is filed with the central filing officer over all unfiled liens and all subsequent filed or unfiled liens, except such liens as may be exempted by regulation of the state board of human services. A lien on personal property arising pursuant to this subsection (1.5) may be extended or renewed indefinitely beyond twelve years by rerecording the lien every twelve years.

(III) Liens on motor vehicles created pursuant to this section shall remain in effect for the same period of time as any other lien on motor vehicles as specified in section 42-6-127, C.R.S., or until all past-due amounts are paid, whichever occurs first, and shall have priority from the time the lien is filed for public record and noted on the owner's certificate of title over all unfiled liens and all subsequent filed or unfiled liens, except such liens as may be exempted by regulation of the state board of human services.

Notice of lien - contents. (I) The notice of lien shall contain the following information:

The name and address of the delegate child support enforcement unit and the name of the obligee or the assignee of the obligee as grantee of the lien;

The name, social security number, and last-known address of the obligor as grantor of the lien;

The year, make, and vehicle identification number of any motor vehicle for liens arising pursuant to paragraph (d) of this subsection (1.5);

A general description of the personal property for liens arising pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection (1.5);

The county and court case number of the court of record that issued the order of current child support, child support debt, retroactive child support, child support arrearages, child support when combined with maintenance, or maintenance or of the court of record where the verified entry of judgment was filed;

The date the order was entered;

The date the obligation commenced;

The amount of the order for current child support, child support debt, retroactive child support, child support arrearages, child support when combined with maintenance, or maintenance;

The total amount of past-due support as of a date certain; and

(J) A statement that interest may accrue on all amounts ordered to be paid, pursuant to sections 14-14-106 and 5-12-101, C.R.S., and may be collected from the obligor in addition to costs of sale, attorney fees, and any other costs or fees incident to such sale for liens arising pursuant to paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection (1.5).

For purposes of liens against motor vehicles, the notice of lien shall include the information set forth in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (f) in addition to the information specified in section 42-6-120, C.R.S.

Rules. The state board of human services shall promulgate rules and regulations concerning the procedures and mechanism by which to implement this subsection (1.5).

Bona fide purchasers - bona fide lenders. (I) The provisions of this subsection (1.5) shall not apply to any bona fide purchaser who acquires an interest in any personal property or any motor vehicle without notice of the lien or to any bona fide lender who lent money to the obligor without notice of the lien the security or partial security for which is any personal property or motor vehicle of such obligor.

(II) For purposes of this paragraph (h):

"Bona fide purchaser" means a purchaser for value in good faith and without notice of an adverse claim, including but not limited to an automatic lien arising pursuant to this subsection (1.5).

"Bona fide lender" means a lender for value in good faith and without notice of an adverse claim, including but not limited to an automatic lien arising pursuant to this subsection (1.5).

No liability. No clerk and recorder, authorized agent as defined in section 42-6-102 (1.5), financial institution, lienholder, or filing officer, nor any employee of any of such persons or entities, shall be liable for damages for actions taken in good faith compliance with this subsection (1.5).

Definition. For purposes of this subsection (1.5), "child support debt" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 26-13.5-102 (3), C.R.S.

Unless otherwise agreed in writing or expressly provided in the decree, the obligation to pay future maintenance is terminated upon the earlier of:

The death of either party;

The end of the maintenance term, unless a motion for modification is filed prior to the expiration of the term;

The remarriage of or the establishment of a civil union by the party receiving maintenance; or

A court order terminating maintenance.

A payor spouse whose income is reduced or terminated due to his or her retirement after reaching full retirement age is entitled to a rebuttable presumption that the retirement is in good faith.

For purposes of this subsection (2), "full retirement age" means the payor's usual or ordinary retirement age when he or she would be eligible for full United States social security benefits, regardless of whether he or she is ineligible for social security benefits for some reason other than attaining full retirement age. "Full retirement age" shall not mean "early retirement age" if early retirement is available to the payor spouse, nor shall it mean "maximum benefit retirement age" if additional benefits are available as a result of delayed retirement.

Unless otherwise agreed in writing or expressly provided in the decree, provisions for the support of a child are terminated by emancipation of the child but not by the death of a parent obligated to support the child. When a parent obligated to pay support dies, the amount of support may be modified, revoked, or commuted to a lump-sum payment, to the extent just and appropriate in the circumstances.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the provisions of any decree respecting child support may be modified as a result of the change in age for the duty of support as provided in section 14-10-115 (15), but only as to installments accruing subsequent to the filing of the motion for modification; except that section 14-10-115 (15)(b) does not apply to modifications of child support orders with respect to a child who has already achieved the age of nineteen as of July 1, 1991.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, when a court-ordered, voluntary, or mutually agreed upon change of physical care occurs, the provisions for child support of the obligor under the existing child support order, if modified pursuant to this section, will be modified or terminated as of the date when physical care was changed. The provisions for the establishment of a child support order based on a court-ordered, voluntary, or mutually agreed upon change of physical care may also be entered retroactively to the date when the physical care was changed. When a court-ordered, voluntary, or mutually agreed upon change of physical care occurs, parties are encouraged to avail themselves of the provision set forth in section 14-10-115 (14)(a) for updating and modifying a child support order without a court hearing. The court shall not modify child support pursuant to this subsection (5) for any time more than five years prior to the filing of the motion to modify child support, unless the court finds that its application would be substantially inequitable, unjust, or inappropriate. The five-year prohibition on retroactive modification does not preclude a request for relief pursuant to any statute or court rule.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article, within the time frames set forth in paragraph (c) of this subsection (6), the individual named as the father in the order may file a motion to modify or terminate an order for child support entered pursuant to this article if genetic test results based on DNA testing, administered in accordance with section 13-25-126, C.R.S., establish the exclusion of the individual named as the father in the order as the biological parent of the child for whose benefit the child support order was entered.

If the court finds pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (6) that the individual named as the father in the order is not the biological parent of the child for whose benefit the child support order was entered and that it is just and proper under the circumstances and in the best interests of the child, the court shall modify the provisions of the order for support with respect to that child by terminating the child support obligation as to installments accruing subsequent to the filing of the motion for modification or termination, and the court may vacate or deem as satisfied, in whole or in part, unpaid child support obligations arising from or based upon the order determining parentage. The court shall not order restitution from the state for any sums paid to or collected by the state for the benefit of the child.

A motion to modify or terminate an order for child support pursuant to this subsection (6) must be filed within two years from the date of the entry of the initial order establishing the child support obligation.

Repealed.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (6), a court order for child support shall not be modified or terminated pursuant to this subsection (6) if:

The child support obligor acknowledged paternity pursuant to section 19-4-105 (1)(c) or (1)(e), C.R.S., knowing that he was not the father of the child;

The child was adopted by the child support obligor; or

The child was conceived by means of assisted reproduction.

A motion filed pursuant to this section may be brought by the individual named as the father in the order and shall be served in the manner set forth in the Colorado rules of civil procedure upon all other parties. The court shall not modify or set aside a final order determining parentage pursuant to this section without a hearing.

For purposes of this subsection (6), "DNA" means deoxyribonucleic acid.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 529, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-22.

L. 86:

(1) amended, p. 724, § 3, effective November 1.

L. 87:

(1)(c) added, p. 587, § 4, effective July 10.

L. 88:

(1)(c) amended, p. 633, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(1)(a) and (1)(c) amended, p. 792, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(1)(c) amended, p. 891, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(4) and (5) added, pp. 238, 253, §§ 2, 8, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1)(d) added, p. 203, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 93:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1557, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1)(c) amended, p. 561, § 6, effective July 1; (1.5) added, p. 1266, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1)(a), (1)(c), (1)(d), and (5) amended, p. 764, § 14, effective July 1; (5) amended, p. 1400, § 46, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 99:

(1.5)(c), (1.5)(e)(II), and (1.5)(i) amended, p. 751, § 21, effective January 1, 2000.

L. 2000:

(1.5)(b)(II) amended, p. 1704, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1.5)(c) amended, p. 1445, § 38, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1.5)(b)(II), (1.5)(c)(II), (1.5)(e)(I), and (1.5)(e)(II) amended, p. 386, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1)(b), (4), and (5) amended, p. 107, § 3, effective March 16.

L. 2008:

(6) added, p. 1656, § 3, effective August 15.

L. 2009:

(1.5)(d)(II) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1258, § 19, effective October 1.

L. 2010:

(1.5)(d)(II) amended, (HB 10-1172), ch. 320, p. 1493, § 18, effective October 1.

L. 2012:

(1)(c) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 831, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1.5)(c)(I) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1675, § 35, effective August 7; (1)(a) and (5) amended, (HB 13-1209), ch. 103, p. 354, § 3, effective January 1, 2014; (2) amended, (HB 13-1058), ch. 176, p. 652, § 2, effective January 1, 2014.

L. 2014:

(2)(a)(III) amended, (HB 14-1379), ch. 307, p. 1300, § 2, effective May 31.

L. 2016:

(1.5)(c)(I) and (5) amended, (HB 16-1165), ch. 157, pp. 490, 496, §§ 2, 8, effective January 1, 2017.

L. 2017:

(1.5)(d)(I)(A) and (1.5)(i) amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1391, § 30, effective May 25.

L. 2019:

(1)(c) and (1.5)(c)(I) amended, (HB 19-1215), ch. 270, p. 2552, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(1)(a) amended, (HB 21-1031), ch. 116, p. 450, § 2, effective May 7.

Editor's note:

(1) Amendments to subsection (5) by Senate Bill 98-139 and House Bill 98-1183 were harmonized, effective February 1, 1999.

(2) The term "custody" has been changed in other places in the Colorado Revised Statutes to correspond with the use of the term "parental responsibility" as described in § 14-10-124.

(3) Subsection (6)(c)(II)(B) provided for the repeal of subsection (6)(c)(II), effective July 1, 2011. (See L. 2008, p. 1656.)

(4) Section 8 of chapter 116 (HB 21-1031), Session Laws of Colorado 2021, provides that the act changing this section applies to any request to modify an order appealed on, after, or before May 7, 2021.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1997 act enacting subsection (1.5), see section 1 of chapter 236, Session Laws of Colorado 1997. For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1031, see section 1 of chapter 116, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

14-10-123. Commencement of proceedings concerning allocation of parental responsibilities - jurisdiction - automatic temporary injunction - enforcement - definitions.

A proceeding concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities is commenced in the district court or as otherwise provided by law:

By a parent:

By filing a petition for dissolution or legal separation; or

By filing a petition seeking the allocation of parental responsibilities with respect to a child in the county where the child is permanently resident or where the child is found; or

By a person other than a parent, by filing a petition seeking the allocation of parental responsibilities for the child in the county where the child is permanently resident or where the child is found, but only if the child is not in the physical care of one of the child's parents;

By a person other than a parent who has had the physical care of a child for a period of one hundred eighty-two days or more, if such action is commenced within one hundred eighty-two days after the termination of such physical care; or

By a parent or person other than a parent who has been granted custody of a child or who has been allocated parental responsibilities through a juvenile court order entered pursuant to section 19-1-104 (6), C.R.S., by filing a certified copy of the juvenile court order in the county where the child is permanently resident. Such order shall be treated in the district court as any other decree issued in a proceeding concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities.

(1.3) As used in this section, excluding subsection (1.5) of this section:

"Child" has the same meaning as set forth in section 19-1-103.

"Parent" has the same meaning as set forth in section 19-1-103.

(1.5) (a) For purposes of this subsection (1.5) only, "child" means an unmarried individual who has not attained twenty-one years of age.

The court may enter an order for allocation of parental responsibilities for a child, as defined in subsection (1.5)(a) of this section, and a determination of whether the child shall be reunified with a parent or parents, when the requirements of subsection (1) of this section are met, the order is in the child's best interests, and:

The child has not attained twenty-one years of age;

The child is residing with and dependent upon a caregiver; and

A request is made for findings from the court to establish the child's eligibility for classification as a special immigrant juvenile pursuant to 8 U.S.C. sec. 1101 (a)(27)(J).

If a request is made for findings from the court to establish the child's eligibility for classification as a special immigrant juvenile under federal law and the court determines that there is sufficient evidence to support the findings, the court shall enter an order, including factual findings and conclusions of law, determining that:

The child has been placed under the custody of an individual appointed by the court pursuant to an order for allocation of parental responsibilities;

Reunification of the child with one or both parents is not viable due to abuse, neglect, abandonment, or a similar basis found under state law; and

It is not in the best interests of the child to be returned to the child's or parents' previous country of nationality or country of last habitual residence.

(1.8) The court shall make all necessary persons parties to the proceeding pursuant to the requirements of section 19-4-110 and shall make a determination pursuant to section 19-4-105 as to legal parentage.

Except for a proceeding concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities commenced pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of this section, notice of a proceeding concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities shall be given to the child's parent, guardian, and custodian or person allocated parental responsibilities, who may appear and be heard and may file a responsive pleading. The court may, upon a showing of good cause, permit the intervention of other interested parties.

(2.5) Upon the filing of a petition pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, each party shall provide to the court, in the manner prescribed by the court, his or her social security number and the social security number of each child named in the petition.

Upon the filing of a petition concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities pursuant to this section and upon personal service of the petition and summons on a respondent or upon waiver and acceptance of service by a respondent, a temporary injunction shall be in effect against both parties:

(I) Enjoining each party from molesting or disturbing the peace of the other party;

(II) Restraining each party from removing a minor child who is the subject of the proceeding from the state without the consent of all other parties or an order of the court modifying the injunction; and

(III) Restraining each party, without at least fourteen days' advance notification and the written consent of all other parties or an order of the court modifying the injunction, from canceling, modifying, terminating, or allowing to lapse for nonpayment of premiums a policy of health insurance or life insurance that provides coverage to a minor child who is the subject of the proceeding or that names the minor child as a beneficiary of a policy.

The provisions of the temporary injunction shall be printed upon the summons and the petition. The temporary injunction shall be in effect upon personal service of the petition and summons on a respondent or upon waiver and acceptance of service by a respondent and shall remain in effect against each party until the court enters the final decree, dismisses the petition, or enters a further order modifying the injunction. A party may apply to the court for further temporary orders pursuant to section 14-10-125, an expanded temporary injunction, or modification or revocation of the temporary injunction.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (3), the temporary injunction described in this subsection (3) shall not apply to a proceeding concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities commenced pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of this section or to a proceeding concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities commenced by a parent that is governed by the automatic temporary injunction pursuant to section 14-10-107 (4)(b).

For purposes of enforcing the automatic temporary injunction that becomes effective in accordance with this subsection (3), if the respondent shows a duly authorized peace officer, as described in section 16-2.5-101, C.R.S., a copy of the petition and summons filed and issued pursuant to this section, or if the petitioner shows the peace officer a copy of the petition and summons filed and issued pursuant to this section together with a certified copy of the affidavit of service of process or a certified copy of the waiver and acceptance of service, and the peace officer has cause to believe that a violation of the part of the automatic temporary injunction that enjoins a party from molesting or disturbing the peace of the other party has occurred, the peace officer shall use every reasonable means to enforce that part of the injunction against the petitioner or respondent, as applicable. A peace officer shall not be held civilly or criminally liable for his or her actions pursuant to this subsection (3) if the peace officer acts in good faith and without malice.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 529, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-23.

L. 73:

p. 554, § 10.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 515, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 1377, § 3, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2010:

(3) added, (HB 10-1097), ch. 39, p. 159, § 2, effective August 15.

L. 2011:

(2.5) added, (SB 11-123), ch. 46, p. 119, § 3, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(1)(c) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 832, § 29, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1.5) added, (HB 19-1042), ch. 55, p. 193, § 5, effective March 28.

L. 2021:

(1.3) and (1.8) added, (HB 21-1220), ch. 212, p. 1119, § 2, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For procedure for intervention of other parties generally, see C.R.C.P. 24; for procedure in a custody proceeding, see § 14-13-209.

14-10-123.3. Requests for parental responsibility for a child by grandparents.

Whenever a grandparent seeks parental responsibility for his or her grandchild pursuant to the provisions of this article, the court entering such order shall consider any credible evidence of the grandparent's past conduct of child abuse or neglect. Such evidence may include, but shall not be limited to, medical records, school records, police reports, information contained in records and reports of child abuse or neglect, and court records received by the court pursuant to section 19-1-307 (2)(f), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire section added, p. 261, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 1378, § 4, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1401, § 4, effective January 1, 2004.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2003 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 196, Session Laws of Colorado 2003.

14-10-123.4. Rights of children in matters relating to parental responsibilities.

The general assembly hereby declares that children have certain rights in the determination of matters relating to parental responsibilities, including:

The right to have such determinations based upon the best interests of the child;

The right to be emotionally, mentally, and physically safe when in the care of either parent; and

The right to reside in and visit in homes that are free of domestic violence and child abuse or neglect.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 574, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 1378, § 5, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1259), ch. 218, p. 995, § 1, effective July 1.

14-10-123.5. Joint custody. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 83:

Entire section added, p. 645, § 2, effective June 10.

L. 84:

(4) amended, p. 1118, § 10, effective June 7.

L. 87:

(1) and (6) amended and (8) added, pp. 574, 575, §§ 5, 2, effective July 1; (6) repealed, p. 577, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(9) added by revision, pp. 1378, 1415, §§ 6, 85.

Editor's note:

Subsection (9) provided for the repeal of this section, effective February 1, 1999. (See L. 98, pp. 1378, 1415.)